Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2211
Practice of nursing by a licensed practical nurse, defined.

(1) Practice of nursing by a licensed practical nurse means the assumption of responsibilities and accountability for nursing practice in accordance with knowledge and skills acquired through an approved program of practical nursing. A licensed practical nurse may function at the direction of a licensed practitioner or a registered nurse.

(2) Such responsibilities and performances of acts must utilize procedures leading to predictable outcomes and must include, but not be limited to:

(a) Contributing to the assessment of the health status of individuals and groups;

(b) Participating in the development and modification of a plan of care;

(c) Implementing the appropriate aspects of the plan of care;

(d) Maintaining safe and effective nursing care rendered directly or indirectly;

(e) Participating in the evaluation of response to interventions;

(f) Providing intravenous therapy if the licensed practical nurse meets the requirements of section 38-2237; and

(g) Assigning and directing nursing interventions that may be performed by others and that do not conflict with the Nurse Practice Act.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 767;

Laws 2017, LB88, § 68.